Florida, session 2026, SB1040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 215.994, Florida Statutes, is created to 13 read: 14 215.994âFlorida Strategic Cryptocurrency Reserve.â 15 (1)âThe Florida Cryptocurrency Reserve is a trust fund 16 created within the office of the Chief Financial Officer. 17 (2)âThe reserve shall consist of all of the following: 18 (a)âMoney transferred or deposited to the credit of the 19 reserve by legislative appropriation. The Legislature may 20 appropriate funds for deposit to the credit of the reserve for 21 the purposes of: 22 1.âInvesting in cryptocurrency; and 23 2.âAdministering and managing all aspects of the reserve. 24 Administering the reserve includes, but is not limited to, being 25 responsible for and supervising the custody, consultants, 26 external managers, and software related to the implementation of 27 the reserve. 28 (b)âRevenue that the Legislature by general law dedicates 29 for deposit to the credit of the reserve. 30 (c)âCryptocurrency purchased using money in or received by 31 the reserve, including any cryptocurrency: 32 1.âDerived from the fork of a distributed ledger; or 33 2.âDistributed pursuant to an airdrop to the stateâs 34 cryptocurrency addresses. 35 (d)âInvestment earnings, interest, or rewards accruing on 36 reserve moneys that are not invested in cryptocurrency, which 37 earnings, interest, or rewards may be invested as provided in s. 38 17.57. 39 (3)âThe purpose of the reserve is to acquire, hold, manage, 40 and dispose of cryptocurrency and any assets authorized in this 41 section or s. 215.993 for the benefit of the state; to 42 strengthen the stateâs financial security and resilience; to 43 diversify the stateâs investment portfolio, including providing 44 a potential hedge against inflation and economic volatility; and 45 to position the state to participate in and adapt to the 46 emerging digital economy. 47 (4)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 48 Constitution, the reserve is terminated July 1, 2030, unless 49 terminated sooner. Before its scheduled termination, the reserve 50 shall be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2). 51 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 52 SB 1038 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 53 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 54 thereof and becomes a law.